Hawaii statutes.
[PART II.
MORTGAGE LOAN RECOVERY FUND]

Revision Note

Sections 454F-41 to 454F-47 designated as Part II pursuant to
§23G-15.

§454F-41 Mortgage loan recovery
fund; use of fund; fees. (a) The
commissioner shall establish and maintain a fund that shall be known as the
mortgage loan recovery fund from which any person aggrieved by an act,
representation, transaction, or conduct of a licensee involving fraud,
misrepresentation, or deceit may recover by order of the circuit court or
district court of the county where the violation occurred, an amount of not
more than $25,000 per transaction, including court costs and fees as set by law
and reasonable attorney fees as determined by the court, for damages sustained
by the fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit of a licensee.

(b) In addition to application fees and
any fees required by NMLS, a licensee shall pay to the division a mortgage loan
recovery fund fee as follows for deposit in the mortgage loan recovery fund:

(1) The sum of $300 for each principal office
location of a mortgage loan originator company;

(2) The sum of $250 for each branch office location
of a mortgage loan originator company; and

(3) The sum of $200 for each mortgage loan
originator.

(c) Upon application for renewal of a license
under this chapter, a licensee shall pay, in addition to the licensee's license
renewal fee and fees required by NMLS, a mortgage loan recovery fund fee as
follows for deposit in the mortgage loan recovery fund:

(1) The sum of $200 for each principal office
location of a mortgage loan originator company;

(2) The sum of $100 for each branch office location
of a mortgage loan originator company; and

(3) The sum of $100 for each mortgage loan
originator.

Mortgage loan recovery fund fees collected
pursuant to this subsection shall be refundable upon the denial of a license
renewal by the commissioner.

(d) When the mortgage loan recovery fund
attains a funding level of $750,000, the commissioner may make a finding to
adjust the fees generated by renewals or may determine that payments made by
renewing licensees shall cease. If the funding level falls below $250,000
after the first five years of the establishment of the fund, the commissioner
may adjust the fees to a reasonable level for the purpose of attaining a
funding level of $750,000.

(e) The commissioner or the commissioner's
designee, as the manager of the mortgage loan recovery fund, shall be
authorized to expend moneys in the mortgage loan recovery fund to:

(1) Retain private legal counsel to represent the
commissioner or the division in any action that involves or may result in
payment from the mortgage loan recovery fund;

(2) Retain a certified public accountant for
accounting and auditing of the mortgage loan recovery fund;

(3) Employ necessary personnel, not subject to
chapter 76, to assist the commissioner in exercising the commissioner's powers
and duties with respect to the mortgage loan recovery fund; and

(4) Retain a consultant to recover and collect any
payments from the mortgage loan recovery fund plus interest from the judgment
debtor. [L 2010, c 84, pt of §3; am L 2013, c 168, §19; am L 2015, c 64, §2; am
L 2016, c 122, §18]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next